Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2256] Transcript and diploma
revolving fund. There is established the transcript and diploma revolving
fund that shall be used to defray the cost of transcripts and diplomas and that
shall be replenished through charges made for transcripts and diplomas or
through transfers from other accounts or funds. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next